Maryland, session 2025, SB0244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
14–104.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Local government” includes local school systems, local school boards,
and local health departments.
(3) “Unit” means the Cyber Preparedness Unit.
– 1 –

Ch. 165 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) There is a Cyber Preparedness Unit in the Department.
(2) In coordination with the State Chief Information Security Officer, the
Unit shall:
(i) [support local governments in developing a vulnerability
assessment and cyber assessment, including providing local governments with the
resources and information on best practices to complete the assessments;
(ii)] develop and regularly update an online database of cybersecurity
training resources for local government personnel, including technical training resources,
cybersecurity continuity of operations templates, AND consequence management plans[,
and trainings on malware and ransomware detection];
[(iii)] (II) assist local governments in:
1. the development of cybersecurity preparedness and
response plans;
2. implementing best practices and guidance developed by
the State Chief Information Security Officer; and
3. identifying and acquiring resources to complete
appropriate cybersecurity vulnerability assessments;
[(iv)] (III) connect local governments to appropriate resources for
any other purpose related to cybersecurity preparedness and response;
[(v)] (IV) as necessary and in coordination with the National Guard,
local emergency managers, and other State and local entities, conduct regional
cybersecurity preparedness exercises; and
[(vi)] (V) establish regional assistance groups to deliver and
coordinate support services to local governments, agencies, or regions.
(3) The Unit shall support the Office of Security Management in the
Department of Information Technology during emergency response efforts.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–2A–04.
(a) (1) The Office is responsible for:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 165
(i) the direction, coordination, and implementation of the overall
cybersecurity strategy and policy for units of State government; and
(ii) supporting and coordinating with the Maryland Department of
Emergency Management Cyber Preparedness Unit during emergency response efforts.
(2) The Office is not responsible for the information technology installation
and maintenance operations normally conducted by a unit of State government, a unit of
local government, a local school board, a local school system, or a local health department.
(b) The Office shall:
(1) establish standards to categorize all information collected or
maintained by or on behalf of each unit of State government;
(2) establish standards to categorize all information systems maintained
by or on behalf of each unit of State government;
(3) develop guidelines governing the types of information and information
systems to be included in each category;
(4) establish security requirements for information and information
systems in each category;
(5) assess the categorization of information and information systems and
the associated implementation of the security requirements established under item (4) of
this subsection;
(6) if the State Chief Information Security Officer determines that there
are security vulnerabilities or deficiencies in any information systems, determine and direct
or take actions necessary to correct or remediate the vulnerabilities or deficiencies, which
may include requiring the information system to be disconnected;
(7) if the State Chief Information Security Officer determines that there is
a cybersecurity threat caused by, AFFECTING, OR POTENTIALLY AFFECTING an entity
connected to the network established under § 3.5–404 of this title that introduces OR MAY
INTRODUCE a serious risk to entities connected to the network or to the State, take or
direct actions required to mitigate the threat;
(8) manage security awareness training for all appropriate employees of
units of State government;
(9) assist in the development of data management, data governance, and
data specification standards to promote standardization and reduce risk;
– 3 –

Ch. 165 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(10) assist in the development of a digital identity standard and
specification applicable to all parties communicating, interacting, or conducting business
with or on behalf of a unit of State government;
(11) develop and maintain information technology security policy,
standards, and guidance documents, consistent with best practices developed by the
National Institute of Standards and Technology;
(12) to the extent practicable, seek, identify, and inform relevant
stakeholders of any available financial assistance provided by the federal government or
non–State entities to support the work of the Office;
(13) provide technical assistance to localities in mitigating and recovering
from cybersecurity incidents; [and]
(14) provide technical services, advice, and guidance to units of local
government to improve cybersecurity preparedness, prevention, response, and recovery
practices; AND
(15) SUPPORT LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IN DEVELOPING A
VULNERABILITY ASSESSMENT AND CYBER ASSESSMENT, INCLUDING PROVIDING
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS WITH THE RESOURCES AND INFORMATION ON BEST
PRACTICES TO COMPLETE THE ASSESSMENTS.
(c) The Office, in coordination with the Maryland Department of Emergency
Management, shall:
(1) assist local political subdivisions, including counties, school systems,
school boards, and local health departments, in[:
(i) the development of cybersecurity preparedness and response
plans; and
(ii)] implementing best practices and guidance developed by the
Department; and
(2) connect local entities to appropriate resources for any other purpose
related to cybersecurity preparedness and response.
(d) The Office, in coordination with the Maryland Department of Emergency
Management, may:
(1) conduct regional exercises, as necessary, in coordination with the
National Guard, local emergency managers, and other State and local entities; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 165
(2) establish regional assistance groups to deliver or coordinate support
services to local political subdivisions, agencies, or regions.
(e) (1) On or before December 31 each year, the Office shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate
Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, the House
Appropriations Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and
the Joint Committee on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology on the
activities of the Office and the state of cybersecurity preparedness in Maryland, including:
(i) the activities and accomplishments of the Office during the
previous 12 months at the State and local levels; and
(ii) a compilation and analysis of the data from the information
contained in the reports received by the Office under § 3.5–405 of this title, including:
1. a summary of the issues identified by the cybersecurity
preparedness assessments conducted that year;
2. the status of vulnerability assessments of all units of State
government and a timeline for completion and cost to remediate any vulnerabilities
exposed;
3. recent audit findings of all units of State government and
options to improve findings in future audits, including recommendations for staff, budget,
and timing;
4. [analysis of the State’s expenditure on cybersecurity
relative to overall information technology spending for the prior 3 years and
recommendations for changes to the budget, including amount, purpose, and timing to
improve State and local cybersecurity preparedness;
5.] efforts to secure financial support for cyber risk mitigation
from federal or other non–State resources;
[6.] 5. key performance indicators on the cybersecurity
strategies in the Department’s information technology master plan, including time, budget,
and staff required for implementation; and
[7.] 6. any additional recommendations for improving
State and local cybersecurity preparedness.
(2) A report submitted under this subsection may not contain information
that reveals cybersecurity vulnerabilities and risks in the State.
– 5 –

Ch. 165 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR BEFORE THE THIRD WEDNESDAY IN JANUARY EACH YEAR, THE OFFICE
SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE,
THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, THE
HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT
OPERATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON CYBERSECURITY,
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, AND BIOTECHNOLOGY ON:
(I) THE STATE’S EXPENDITURE ON CYBERSECURITY RELATIVE
TO OVERALL INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SPENDING FOR THE PRIOR 3 YEARS; AND
(II) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR CHANGES TO THE BUDGET,
INCLUDING THE AMOUNT, PURPOSE, AND TIMING OF FUNDING TO IMPROVE STATE
AND LOCAL CYBERSECURITY PREPAREDNESS.
(2) IN A YEAR WITH A NEWLY ELECTED GOVERNOR, THE REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBMITTED ON
OR BEFORE THE THIRD FRIDAY OF JANUARY.
3.5–303.
(a) The Secretary is responsible for carrying out the following duties:
(1) developing, IMPLEMENTING, maintaining, revising, and enforcing
information technology policies, procedures, and standards;
(5) developing, IMPLEMENTING, and maintaining a statewide
cybersecurity strategy that will:
(i) centralize the management and direction of cybersecurity
strategy within the Executive Branch of State government under the control of the
Department; and
(ii) serve as the basis for budget allocations for cybersecurity
preparedness for the Executive Branch of State government;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 6 –